Washington statutes.
RCW 11.12.400

Electronic wills—Short title.

RCW 11.12.410 through 11.12.491 may be known and cited as the uniform electronic wills act.

[ 2021 c 140 s 1001.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 140 ss 1001-1016: "Sections 1001 through 1016 of this act take effect January 1, 2022." [ 2021 c 140 s 1017.]